District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0310.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the "Closing of a Portion of a Public Alley in Square 3524, S.O. 23-06402,
Temporary Act of 2025."
Sec. 2. Pursuant to Section 201 of the Street and Alley Closing Acquisition Procedures
Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code §9-202.01 et seq)
("Act") the Council finds that the portion of the public alley in Square 3524 shown on the
Surveyor's plat filed under S.O. 23-06402 is unnecessary for alley purposes and orders it closed,
with title to the land to vest as shown on the Surveyor's plat. The approval of the Council for the
alley closing is contingent upon the satisfaction of all the conditions set forth in the official S.O.
23-06402 file, including that prior to the recordation of the plat by the Surveyor, the District
Department of Transportation ("DDOT") shall confirm that:
(a) DDOT has received from the owner of Lot 53 in Square 3524 the $4,265 cost of
removing the existing street lighting on the portion of the alley to be closed; and

(b) A Tree Protection Plan for the Special Tree located on the portion of the alley to be closed
or a permit to remove that Special Tree has been approved by DDOT’s Urban Forestry Division.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement prepared by the Chief Financial Officer as
the fiscal impact statement required by section 602(c)(3) of the District of Columbia Home Rule
Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code §1-206.02 (c)(3)).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
(a) This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by
the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.
(b) This act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.